Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
Subpart 2 Duties and Operation of Filing Office and Central Indexing System

11-9-519.
Numbering, maintaining, and indexing records; communicating information provided in records.

Filing office duties.For each record filed in a filing office, the filing office shall:

Assign a unique number to the filed record;

Create a record that bears the number assigned to the filed record and the date and time of filing;

Maintain the filed record or a microfilm or other photostatic, microphotographic, photographic copy, or optical image of the filed record for public inspection;

Transmit each record to the authority in such form and manner as may be required by the authority within 24 hours of filing. Weekends and holidays shall not be included in the calculation of the 24 hour period; and

Promptly upon discovering any discrepancy between a filed record and the information as it appears in the central indexing system, retransmit such record to the authority with a notation as to the discrepancy and a request for correction of the central indexing system information.

Central indexing system.

The authority shall administer, maintain, and modify a central indexing system which shall contain the records transmitted to it by filing offices pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section. The authority shall, within 24 hours after receipt of each record, include the record in the central filing system and make such information available to the public through the central index. Weekends and holidays shall not be included in the calculation of the 24 hour period.

The authority may designate one or more agents who will be responsible for any or all of the duties and functions of the authority set out in this Code section.

Indexing; general.The authority shall:

Index an initial financing statement according to the name of the debtor and index all filed records relating to the initial financing statement in a manner that associates with one another an initial financing statement and all filed records relating to the initial financing statement; and

Index a record that provides a name of a debtor which was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the record relates also according to the name that was not previously provided.

Indexing; real property related financing statement.If a financing statement is filed as a fixture filing or covers as-extracted collateral, crops, or timber to be cut, it must be filed for record and the filing office shall index it:

Under the names of the debtor and of each owner of record shown on the financing statement as if they were the mortgagors under a mortgage of the real property described; and

To the extent that the law of this state provides for indexing of records of mortgages under the name of the mortgagee, under the name of the secured party as if the secured party were the mortgagee thereunder, or, if indexing is by description, as if the financing statement were a record of a mortgage of the real property described.

Indexing; real property related assignment.If a financing statement is filed as a fixture filing or covers as-extracted collateral, crops, or timber to be cut, the filing office shall index an assignment filed under subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-514 or an amendment filed under subsection (b) of Code Section 11-9-514:

Under the name of the assignor as grantor; and

To the extent that the law of this state provides for indexing a record of the assignment of a mortgage, under the name of the assignee.

Retrieval and association capability.The authority and each filing office shall maintain a capability with respect to the records they are required to index:

To retrieve a record by the name of the debtor and by the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates; and

To associate and retrieve with one another an initial financing statement and each filed record relating to the initial financing statement.

Removal of debtor’s name.The authority may not remove a debtor’s name from the central index until one year after the effectiveness of a financing statement naming the debtor lapses under Code Section 11-9-515 with respect to all secured parties of record.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-519, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 11.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 18, 2002, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in paragraph (e)(2).

11-9-520.
Acceptance and refusal to accept record.

Refusal to accept record.A filing office may refuse to accept a record for filing only for a reason set forth in subsection (b) of Code Section 11-9-516.

Communication concerning refusal.If a filing office refuses to accept a record for filing, it shall communicate to the person that presented the record the fact of and reason for the refusal and the date and time the record would have been filed had the filing office accepted it. The communication must be made at the time and in the manner prescribed by filing office rule but in no event more than two business days after the filing office receives the record.

When filed financing statement effective.A filed financing statement satisfying subsections (a) and (b) of Code Section 11-9-502 is effective, even if the filing office refuses to accept it for filing under subsection (a) of this Code section. However, Code Section 11-9-338 applies to a filed financing statement providing information described in paragraph (5) of subsection (b) of Code Section 11-9-516 which is incorrect at the time the financing statement is filed.

Separate application to multiple debtors.If a record communicated to a filing office provides information that relates to more than one debtor, this part applies as to each debtor separately.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-520, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-521.
Uniform form of written financing statement and amendment; authority may prescribe forms.

Initial financing statement form.Except for a reason set forth in subsection (b) of Code Section 11-9-516, a filing office that accepts written records may not refuse to accept a written initial financing statement in the form and format set forth in the final official text of the 2010 amendments to Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code promulgated by the American Law Institute and the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws, and such form and format are incorporated into this subsection by reference.

Amendment form.Except for a reason set forth in subsection (b) of Code Section 11-9-516, a filing office that accepts written records may not refuse to accept a written record amending an initial financing statement if such record is in the form and format set forth in the final official text of the 2010 amendments to Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code promulgated by the American Law Institute and the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws, and such form and format are incorporated into this subsection by reference.

Authority’s forms.The authority may prescribe forms for initial financing statements and amendments. Subject to the provisions of subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section, all written financing statements and amendments must be presented for filing on forms prescribed by the authority.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-521, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 415, § 11; Ga. L. 2013, p. 690, § 16/SB 185.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 18, 2002, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, added the catchline for subsection (c).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “set forth in the final official text of the 2010 amendments to Article 9” for “set out in Section 9-521(a) of the Official Text of Revised Article 9, 2000 Revision,” in the middle of subsection (a); and substituted “set forth in the final official text of the 2010 amendments to Article 9” for “set out in Section 9-521(b) of the Official Text of Revised Article 9, 2000 Revision,” in the middle of subsection (b).

11-9-522.
Maintenance and destruction of records.

Postlapse maintenance and retrieval of information.The authority shall maintain a record of the information provided in a filed record for at least one year after the effectiveness of such record or the initial financing statement to which such record relates has lapsed under Code Section 11-9-515 with respect to all secured parties of record. The record must be retrievable by using the name of the debtor and by using the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the record relates.

Destruction of written records.Except to the extent that an applicable statute governing disposition of public records provides otherwise, the filing office or the authority immediately may destroy any written record evidencing a financing statement. However, if the filing office or the authority destroys a written record, it shall maintain another record of the financing statement which complies with subsection (a) of this Code section.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-522, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-523.
Information from filing office and central indexing system; sale or license of records.

Acknowledgment of filing written record.If a person that files a written record requests an acknowledgment of the filing, the filing office shall send to the person an image of the record showing the number assigned to the record pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-519 and the date and time of the filing of the record. However, if the person furnishes a copy of the record to the filing office, the filing office may instead:

Note upon the copy the number assigned to the record pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-519 and the date and time of the filing of the record; and

Send the copy to the person.

Acknowledgment of filing other record.If a person files a record other than a written record, the filing office shall communicate to the person an acknowledgment that provides:

The information in the record;

The number assigned to the record pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-519; and

The date and time of the filing of the record.

Communication of requested information.Upon payment of a fee therefor established from time to time by the authority, the authority shall communicate or otherwise make available in a record the following information to any person that requests it:

Whether there is on file on a date and time specified by the authority, but not a date earlier than three business days before the authority receives the request, any financing statement that:

Designates a particular debtor (or, if the request so states, designates a particular debtor at the address specified in the request);

Has not lapsed under Code Section 11-9-515 with respect to all secured parties of record; and

If the request so states, has lapsed under Code Section 11-9-515 and a record of which is maintained by the authority under subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-522;

The date and time of filing of each financing statement; and

The information provided in each financing statement.

Medium for communicating information.In complying with its duty under subsection (c) of this Code section, the authority may communicate information in any medium. However, if requested, the authority shall communicate information by issuing a record that can be admitted into evidence in the courts of this state without extrinsic evidence of its authenticity.

Timeliness of performance.The filing office shall perform the acts required by subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section and the authority shall perform the acts required by subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section at the time and in the manner prescribed by filing office rule but not later than two business days after the filing office or the authority, as the case may be, receives the request.

Public availability of records.At least weekly, the authority shall offer to sell or license to the public on a nonexclusive basis, upon payment of the fee therefor established from time to time by the authority, in bulk, copies of all records transmitted to it under this part, in every medium from time to time available to the authority.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-523, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-524.
Delay by filing office or authority.

Delay by the filing office or authority beyond a time limit prescribed by this part is excused if:

The delay is caused by interruption of communication or computer facilities, war, emergency conditions, failure of equipment, or other circumstances beyond control of the filing office or authority; and

The filing office or authority exercises reasonable diligence under the circumstances.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-524, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-525.
Fees.

Initial financing statement; general.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, the fees for filing a record under this part are the amounts specified in Article 2 of Chapter 6 of Title 15.

Fees of the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority.The Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority is authorized to set and collect fees for incidental services and information provided by the authority or its designated agent with respect to the central indexing system if such fees are not otherwise prescribed by law.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-525, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-526.
Rules.

Adoption of filing office rules.The authority shall adopt and publish in print or electronically rules to implement this article, including rules to administer, maintain, and modify the central indexing system. The filing office rules must be consistent with this article.

Harmonization of rules.To keep the filing office rules, practices of the filing offices, and practices of the authority in harmony with the rules and practices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this part, and to keep the technology used by the filing offices and the authority compatible with the technology used in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this part, the authority, so far as is consistent with the purposes, policies, and provisions of this article, in adopting, amending, and repealing filing office rules, shall:

Consult with filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this part; and

Consult the most recent version of the Model Rules promulgated by the International Association of Corporate Administrators or any successor organization; and

Take into consideration the rules and practices of, and the technology used by, filing offices in other jurisdictions that enact substantially this part.

Notification system for farm products.The authority shall not be authorized to adopt rules to implement a notification system for farm products in conformity with the requirements of Section 1324 of the federal Food Security Act of 1985, P.L. 99-198, as now in effect or as hereafter amended, and shall not be authorized to request certification of such notification system by the secretary of the United States Department of Agriculture.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-526, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388.

The 2010 amendment,

effective June 3, 2010, inserted “in print or electronically” in the first sentence of subsection (a).